Montana, session 2025, HB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-2-108, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-2-108. Rulemaking for statewide voter registration list. (1) The secretary of state shall adopt
rules to implement the provisions of 42 U.S.C. 15483 and this chapter.
(2) The rules must include but are not limited to:
(a) (i) a list of maintenance procedures, including new data entry, updates, registration transfers,
and other procedures for keeping information current and accurate and for determining one of the following
three citizenship statuses for registered electors:
(A) United States citizenship;
- 1 - LC 1203

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1203
(B) undetermined citizenship; and
(C) non-United States citizenship; and
(ii) procedures for:
(A) alerting an elector with undetermined citizenship status of their status and providing a means
for that elector to demonstrate United States citizenship status; and
(B) removing from the list of electors a person determined to have non-United States citizenship
status;
(b) proper maintenance and use of active and inactive lists;
(c) proper maintenance and use of lists for legally registered electors and provisionally registered
electors;
(d) technical security of the statewide voter registration system;
(e) information security with respect to keeping from general public distribution driver's license
numbers, whole or partial social security numbers, and address information protected from general disclosure
pursuant to 13-2-115; and
(f) quality control measures for the system and system users.
(3) The rules adopted by the secretary of state must reflect that an elector who was properly
registered prior to January 1, 2003, is considered a legally registered elector."

Section 2. Section 13-2-109, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-2-109. Rulemaking on sufficiency and verification of voter registration information. (1) The
secretary of state shall adopt rules:
(a) to implement the provisions of 13-2-110 and this section concerning how election
administrators determine whether the information provided by an elector on an application for voter registration
is:
(i) sufficient to be accepted and processed; or
(ii) insufficient to be accepted and processed;
(b) establishing procedures for verifying the accuracy of voter registration information;
(c) establishing standards for determining whether an elector may be legally registered or
- 2 - LC 1203

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1203
provisionally registered and the effect of that registration on identification requirements;
(d) establishing procedures for determining citizenship status of new applicants; and
(e) establishing procedures for notifying electors about the status of their applications and
registration.
(2) The rules may not conflict with 42 U.S.C. 15301, et seq., or 13-2-208."

Section 3. Section 13-2-110, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-2-110. Application for voter registration -- sufficiency and verification of information --
identifiers assigned for voting purposes -- rulemaking. (1) An individual may apply for voter registration in
person or by mail, postage paid, by completing and signing the standard application form for voter registration
provided for in 13-1-210 and providing the application to the election administrator in the county in which the
elector resides.
(2) Each application for voter registration must be accepted and processed as provided in rules
adopted under 13-2-109.
(3) The applicant shall provide documentary proof of United States citizenship in a manner
prescribed by the secretary of state through rulemaking.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5), an applicant for voter registration shall provide the
applicant's:
(a) Montana driver's license number;
(b) Montana state identification card number issued pursuant to 61-12-501; or
(c) the last four digits of the applicant's social security number.
(5) (a) If an applicant is unable to provide information in accordance with subsection (3) (4), the
applicant shall provide as an alternative form of identification:
(i) a military identification card, a tribal photo identification card, a United States passport, or a
Montana concealed carry permit; or
(ii) (A) any other form of photo identification, including but not limited to a school district or
postsecondary education photo identification with the individual's name; and
(B) a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, government check, or other government
- 3 - LC 1203

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1203
document that shows the individual's name and current address.
(b) The alternative form of identification must be:
(i) an original version presented to the election administrator if the applicant is applying in person;
or
(ii) a readable copy of any of the required documents, which must be enclosed with the
application, if the applicant is applying by mail.
(6) (a) If information provided on an application for voter registration is sufficient to be accepted
and processed and is verified pursuant to rules adopted under 13-2-109, the election administrator shall
register the elector as a legally registered elector.
(b) If information provided on an application for voter registration was sufficient to be accepted but
the applicant failed to provide the information required in subsection (3) or (4) (4) or (5) or if the information
provided was incorrect or insufficient to verify the individual's identity or eligibility to vote, the election
administrator shall register the applicant as a provisionally registered elector.
(7) Each applicant for voter registration must be notified of the elector's registration status pursuant
to rules adopted under 13-2-109.
(8) The secretary of state shall assign to each elector whose application was accepted a unique
identification number for voting purposes and shall establish a statewide uniform method to allow the secretary
of state and local election officials to distinguish legally registered electors from provisionally registered
electors.
(9) The provisions of this section may not be interpreted to conflict with voter registration
accomplished under 13-2-221, 13-21-221, and 61-5-107 and as provided for in federal law."

Section 4. Section 13-2-402, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-2-402. Reasons for cancellation. The election administrator shall cancel the registration of an
elector if:
(1) the elector submits a written request for cancellation;
(2) a certificate of the death of the elector is filed or if the elector is reported to the election
administrator as deceased by the department of public health and human services in the department's reports
- 4 - LC 1203

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1203
submitted to the county under 50-15-409 or through a newspaper obituary;
(3) the elector is of unsound mind as established by a court;
(4) the incarceration of the elector in a penal institution for a felony conviction is legally
established;
(5) a certified copy of a court order directing the cancellation is filed with the election administrator;
(6) a notice is received from the secretary of state or from another county or state that the elector
has registered in another county or state;
(7) the elector:
(a) fails to respond to certain confirmation mailings;
(b) is placed on the inactive list; and
(c) then fails to vote in two consecutive federal general elections; or
(8) the elector has been informed by the secretary of state that the elector has an undetermined
United States citizenship status and fails to demonstrate United States citizenship in the manner prescribed by
the secretary of state through rulemaking; or
(9) the elector fails to meet any voter qualification that is listed in 13-1-111."

Section 5. Section 61-14-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"61-14-301. Other rulemaking authority. (1) The department shall adopt rules to identify the entity or
entities that may qualify for grants under 61-3-415 and to establish criteria that an entity must meet to receive
grant funds.
(2) The department shall adopt rules governing sales, including sales of receipts by county
treasurers and other authorized agents.
(3) The department shall adopt rules necessary to assist the secretary of state in verifying the
United States citizenship status of an applicant for voter registration who submits their Montana driver's license
pursuant to 13-2-110.
(4) The department may adopt rules for the application, certification, and determination of the
ability of a self-insurer to pay any judgment under 61-6-143.
(5) The department may adopt rules for individuals who are exempt from wearing seatbelts under
- 5 - LC 1203

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1203
61-13-103.
(4) The department shall adopt rules governing sales, including sales of receipts by county
treasurers and other authorized agents.
(6) The department may adopt rules governing the cancellation of received services upon receipt
of an insufficient funds check in payment for a service.
(7) The department may adopt rules for the implementation of the Montana Driver Privacy
Protection Act, including procedures for:
(a) verifying the identity of a person requesting personal information;
(b) maintaining records for release of personal information by the department or by any recipient
under Title 61, chapter 11, part 5; and
(c) providing for oversight of sale or disclosure of personal information to third parties.
(8) The department may adopt rules for governing recordkeeping, including the destruction of
records."

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), [this act] is
effective July 1, 2025.
(2) [Sections 3 and 4] are effective on the date that the secretary of state certifies to the code
commissioner that federal law allows or requires states to determine the United States citizenship status of an
applicant for voter registration and an elector. The secretary of state shall submit certification within 30 days of
the occurrence of the contingency.
- END -
- 6 - LC 1203